District of Columbia statutes.
47-2325

Continuation of uncompleted projects at end of fiscal year.

Any projects or portions of projects chargeable to the Gasoline Tax Road and Street Improvement Fund during the fiscal year 1925 and subsequent fiscal years and uncompleted at the close of those years shall be a continuing charge upon the Fund until completed and shall, except insofar as conditions beyond the control of the Mayor prevent, be given priority over projects subsequently made a charge upon such Fund.

History

Mar. 3, 1925, 43 Stat. 1226, ch. 477
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2325.
1973 Ed., § 47-1919.